Kentucky, session 2025RS, HB595.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the Commonwealth of Kentucky:
Section 1. KRS 403.720 is amended to read as follows:
As used in KRS 403.715 to 403.785:
(1) "Domestic animal" means a dog, cat, or other animal that is domesticated and kept
as a household pet, but does not include animals normally raised for agricultural or
commercial purposes;
(2) "Domestic violence and abuse" means:
(a) Physical injury, serious physical injury, stalking, sexual assault, strangulation,
assault, or the infliction of fear of imminent physical injury, serious physical
injury, sexual assault, strangulation, or assault between family members or
members of an unmarried couple;[ or]
(b) A pattern of physical, sexual, emotional, economic, psychological, or
technological actions or threats of actions between family members or
members of an unmarried couple that is used by one (1) person to gain or
maintain power and control over another, including intimidation,
manipulation, humiliation, isolation, and coercion; or
(c) Any conduct prohibited under[by] KRS 525.125, 525.130, 525.135, or
525.137, or the infliction of fear of such imminent conduct, taken against a
domestic animal when used as a method of coercion, control, punishment,
intimidation, or revenge directed against a family member or member of an
unmarried couple who has a close bond of affection to the domestic animal;
(3) "Family member" means a spouse, including a former spouse, a grandparent, a
grandchild, a parent, an adult sibling, a child, a stepchild, or any other person living
in the same household as a child if the child is the alleged victim;
(4) "Foreign protective order" means any judgment, decree, or order of protection
which is entitled to full faith and credit pursuant to 18 U.S.C. sec. 2265 that was
Page 1 of 4
XXXX 2/11/2025 2:03 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 901
issued on the basis of domestic violence and abuse;
(5) "Global positioning monitoring system" means a system that electronically
determines a person's location through a device worn by the person which does not
invade his or her bodily integrity and which transmits the person's latitude and
longitude data to a monitoring entity;
(6) "Member of an unmarried couple" means each member of an unmarried couple
which allegedly has a child in common, any children of that couple, or a member of
an unmarried couple who are living together or have formerly lived together;
(7) "Order of protection" means an emergency protective order or a domestic violence
order and includes a foreign protective order;
(8) "Sexual assault" refers to conduct prohibited as any degree of rape, sodomy, or
sexual abuse under KRS Chapter 510 or incest under KRS 530.020, or a criminal
attempt, conspiracy, facilitation, or solicitation to commit rape, sodomy, sexual
abuse, or incest;
(9) "Stalking" refers to conduct prohibited as stalking under KRS 508.140 or
508.150, or a criminal attempt, conspiracy, facilitation, or solicitation to commit
the crime of stalking;
(10) "Strangulation" refers to conduct prohibited under[by] KRS 508.170 or[and]
508.175, or a criminal attempt, conspiracy, facilitation, or solicitation to commit the
crime of strangulation; and
(11)[(10)] "Substantial violation" means criminal conduct which involves actual or
threatened harm to the person, family, or property, including a domestic animal, of
an individual protected by an order of protection.
Section 2. KRS 456.010 is amended to read as follows:
As used in this chapter:
(1) "Dating relationship" means a relationship between individuals who have or have
had a relationship of a romantic or intimate nature. It does not include a casual
Page 2 of 4
XXXX 2/11/2025 2:03 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 901
acquaintanceship or ordinary fraternization in a business or social context. The
following factors may be considered in addition to any other relevant factors in
determining whether the relationship is or was of a romantic or intimate nature:
(a) Declarations of romantic interest;
(b) The relationship was characterized by the expectation of affection;
(c) Attendance at social outings together as a couple;
(d) The frequency and type of interaction between the persons, including whether
the persons have been involved together over time and on a continuous basis
during the course of the relationship;
(e) The length and recency of the relationship; and
(f) Other indications of a substantial connection that would lead a reasonable
person to understand that a dating relationship existed;
(2) "Dating violence and abuse" means:
(a) Physical injury, serious physical injury, stalking, sexual assault, strangulation,
or the infliction of fear of imminent physical injury, serious physical injury,
sexual abuse, strangulation, or assault occurring between persons who are or
have been in a dating relationship;[ or]
(b) A pattern of physical, sexual, emotional, economic, psychological, or
technological actions or threats of actions between persons who are or have
been in a dating relationship that is used by one (1) person to gain or
maintain power and control over another, including intimidation,
manipulation, humiliation, isolation, and coercion; or
(c) Any conduct prohibited under[by] KRS 525.125, 525.130, 525.135, or
525.137, or the infliction of fear of such imminent conduct, taken against a
domestic animal when used as a method of coercion, control, punishment,
intimidation, or revenge directed against a person with whom the perpetrator
is or has been in a dating relationship, when that person has a close bond of
Page 3 of 4
XXXX 2/11/2025 2:03 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 901
affection to the domestic animal;
(3) "Domestic animal" means a dog, cat, or other animal that is domesticated and kept
as a household pet, but does not include animals normally raised for agricultural or
commercial purposes;
(4) "Foreign protective order" means any judgment, decree, or order of protection
which is entitled to full faith and credit pursuant to 18 U.S.C. sec. 2265 which was
not issued on the basis of domestic violence and abuse;
(5) "Global positioning monitoring system" means a system that electronically
determines a person's location through a device worn by the person which does not
invade his or her bodily integrity and which transmits the person's latitude and
longitude data to a monitoring entity;
(6) "Order of protection" means any interpersonal protective order, including those
issued on a temporary basis, and includes a foreign protective order;
(7) "Sexual assault" refers to conduct prohibited as any degree of rape, sodomy, or
sexual abuse under KRS Chapter 510 or a criminal attempt, conspiracy, facilitation,
or solicitation to commit any degree of rape, sodomy, or sexual abuse, or incest
under KRS 530.020;
(8) "Stalking" refers to conduct prohibited as stalking under KRS 508.140 or 508.150,
or a criminal attempt, conspiracy, facilitation, or solicitation to commit the crime of
stalking;
(9) "Strangulation" refers to conduct prohibited under[by] KRS 508.170 or[and]
508.175, or a criminal attempt, conspiracy, facilitation, or solicitation to commit the
crime of strangulation; and
(10) "Substantial violation" means criminal conduct which involves actual or threatened
harm to the person, family, or property, including a domestic animal, of an
individual protected by an order of protection.
Page 4 of 4
XXXX 2/11/2025 2:03 PM Jacketed